Utah statutes.
57-14-7.   Person using land of another not relieved from duty to exercise care.

This chapter may not be construed to relieve any person, using the land of another for recreational purposes, from any obligation which the person may have in the absence of this act to exercise care in use of the land and in activities thereon, or from the legal consequences of failure to employ care.



Amended by Chapter 62, 1997 General Session

